Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202579-533.04
School library materials; access by parent, guardian, or educational decisionmaker; school board adopt policy.

(1) For purposes of this section, educational decisionmaker has the same meaning as in section 79-530.

(2) Each school board of a public school district shall adopt a policy for implementation at the beginning of the 2026-27 school year, relating to the rights of a parent, guardian, or educational decisionmaker to access school library materials. Such policy shall:

(a) Require the creation of a catalog of all books in the school district's library, categorized by school building, which shall be accessible for viewing by a parent, guardian, or educational decisionmaker of a student attending such school district; and

(b) Provide the opportunity for a parent, guardian, or educational decisionmaker of a student to be notified when the student of such parent, guardian, or educational decisionmaker checks out a book from the school library by means of a website or application notification or by opting in to email notifications. Such notification shall include:

(i) The title of the book checked out by the student;

(ii) The name of the author of the book checked out by the student; and

(iii) The date the book checked out by the student is due to be returned to the school library.

(3) This section shall only apply to a school library that is located on school district property and shall not apply to any other public library regardless if such library contracts with a school district for use by students.

Laws 2025, LB390, § 1.